Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB814.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail or use of an emergency preparedness item during the exclusion period by an individual purchaser for nonbusiness use. For purposes of this clause, the 12345678910111213141516171819202122 following apply:(i) The term "emergency preparedness item" means any of the following:(A) A portable generator, which costs less than three thousand dollars ($3,000), to provide light or communications or preserve perishable food in the event of a power outage.(B) A storm protection device manufactured, rated and marketed specifically to prevent damage to a glazed or nonglazed opening during a storm or an emergency rescue ladder. The price of the storm protection device or ladder may not exceed three hundred dollars ($300).(C) Any of the following which cost less than seventy-five dollars ($75):(I) A reusable or artificial ice product. (II) A portable, self-powered light source. (III) A gasoline or diesel fuel container. (IV) AAA cell, AA cell, C cell, D cell, six volt, nine volt and cell phone batteries and battery chargers. The term shall not include automotive and boat batteries.(V) A nonelectric cooler or ice chest for food storage. (VI) A tarpaulin or other flexible waterproof sheeting. (VII) A ground anchor system or tie-down kit. (VIII) A portable self-powered radio, including a two-way radio or weather band radio.(IX) A fire extinguisher. (X) A smoke detector. (XI) A carbon monoxide detector. (XII) A hatchet or axe. (XIII) A self-contained first aid kit. (XIV) A nonelectric can opener. 20250SB0814PN0875 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The term "exclusion period" means the period of time from March 2, 2026, to and including March 9, 2026, and from September 7, 2026, to and including September 14, 2026.(iii) The term "purchaser" means an individual who places an order and pays the purchase price by cash or credit during the exclusion period even if delivery takes place after the exclusion period.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0814PN0875 - 3 - 12345678